Maine, session 132, LD1097.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6558 is enacted to read:
§6558. De-escalation and behavior intervention training
1. De-escalation and behavior intervention training. Beginning in the 2026-2027
school year and every 3rd school year thereafter, a school administrative unit shall provide
at least 4 hours of training in the following topics to each of its administrators, teachers and
education technicians:
A. Positive behavior interventions;
B. Communicative intent of behaviors;
C. Alternatives to restrictive procedures, including techniques to identify events and
environmental factors that may escalate behavior;
D. De-escalation methods;
E. Standards for using restraint and seclusion procedures;
F. Obtaining emergency medical assistance;
G. The physiological and psychological effect of restraint and seclusion;
H. Monitoring and responding to a child's physical signs of distress;
I. The school administrative unit's policies and procedures for timely reporting and
documenting of each incident involving the dangerous behavior of a student and the
law governing dangerous behavior prevention and intervention under section 6555; and
J. Positive behavior strategies.
2. Training list. The department shall maintain a list of trainings under subsection 1
and a list of experts who can help school administrative units provide training pursuant to
this section.
3. New hires. Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, a school administrative unit
shall offer training pursuant to this section to all new school administrators, teachers and
education technicians within 60 days of hiring.
Sec. 2. De-escalation and behavior intervention training best practices. The
Department of Education shall convene teachers and other educators and experts in the
subject matter of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section 6558 to develop best
practices for trainings given pursuant to section 6558 and distribute the best practices to all
school administrative units in the State no later than September 1, 2026.